Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Short Title and Reservation of Power.

§79-4-1.01.
Short title.

Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Business Corporation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.01, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Formation of research corporation by universities pursuant to the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 37-147-15.

Use of fictitious names not controlled by §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq., see § 79-4-4.01.

Application of Business Corporation Act to meeting of shareholders held to determine the voting rights to be accorded to shares acquired in control share acquisition, see § 79-27-9.

In a close corporation where a majority stockholder stands to benefit as a controlling stockholder, the majority’s action must be “intrinsically fair” to the minority interest. Thus, stockholders in close corporations must bear towards each other the same relationship of trust and confidence which prevails in partnerships, rather than resort to statutory defenses. This does not mean that directors, executive officers and stockholders are not required to adhere to the corporate statutes; rather, blind adherence to corporate statutes may not be used to circumvent the corporation’s by-laws, charter or various agreements, such as a stock redemption agreement, because of the “intrinsically fair” standard that is now adopted. Fought v. Morris, 543 So. 2d 167, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 221 (Miss. 1989).

A corporation organized under the general corporation law of Mississippi, although possessing some of the features of a cooperative, is organized for profit, and all of its profits whether from member or non-member business constitute income to it, except to the extent that it was under obligation to make patronage dividends, refunds, or rebates, or any portion thereof, to patrons whether stockholders or not. Smith & Wiggins Gin, Inc. v. Commissioner, 341 F.2d 341, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 6609 (5th Cir. 1965).

Kings Daughters and Sons Circle, incorporated for purpose of constructing and operating hospital, held private corporation within Miss. Const., Art. 7, § 183. Brister v. Leflore County, 156 Miss. 240, 125 So. 816, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 159 (Miss. 1930).

Rule that corporation is separate entity from its stockholders will be disregarded when used to support an end subversive of the state’s policy. Southern Electric Sec. Co. v. State, 91 Miss. 195, 44 So. 785, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 136 (Miss. 1907).

The powers of a corporation created under general laws are derived from the statute and not from its charter provisions, and a corporation chartered under this chapter can only exercise the powers therein prescribed. Woodbury v. McClurg, 78 Miss. 831, 29 So. 514, 1901 Miss. LEXIS 131 (Miss. 1901).

Hamilton, The background of the new Mississippi Business Corporation Act.
12 Miss. C. L. Rev. 166, Fall, 1991.

§79-4-1.02.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The Mississippi Legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. are governed by the amendment or repeal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.02, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Definitions of terms used in the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.40.

Application of Mississippi Business Corporation Act to professional corporations, see § 79-10-3.

Applicability of Mississippi Business Corporation Act to trust companies, see § 81-27-4.107.

A mutual fire insurance company empowered by its charter to insure its members only, and having no capital stock, cannot be authorized to carry on the business of insurance. Farmers' Mut. Fire Ins. Co. v. Cole, 90 Miss. 508, 43 So. 949, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 96 (Miss. 1907).

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss L. J. 271, August, 1987.